Utah statutes.
32A-3-108.   Return of inventory.
Any liquor previously received from the department on consignment that remains
unsold at the time the package agent's package agency agreement terminates for
any reason, shall be immediately returned to the department or the liquor is
subject to immediate seizure by the department.
